Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.100

Agency license—Surety bond or certificate of insurance required.

(1) No private investigator agency license may be issued under the provisions of this chapter unless the applicant files with the director a surety bond, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in the sum of ten thousand dollars conditioned to recover against the principal and its servants, officers, agents, and employees by reason of its wrongful or illegal acts in conducting business licensed under this chapter. The bond shall be made payable to the state of Washington, and anyone so injured by the principal or its servants, officers, agents, or employees shall have the right and shall be permitted to sue directly upon this obligation in his or her own name. This obligation shall be subject to successive suits for recovery until the face amount is completely exhausted.

(2) Every licensee must at all times maintain on file with the director the surety bond required by this section in full force and effect. Upon failure by a licensee to do so, the director shall suspend the licensee's license and shall not reinstate the license until this requirement is met.

(3) In lieu of posting bond, a licensed private investigator agency may file with the director a certificate of insurance as evidence that it has comprehensive general liability coverage of at least twenty-five thousand dollars for bodily or personal injury and twenty-five thousand dollars for property damage.

(4) The director may approve alternative methods of guaranteeing financial responsibility.

[ 1995 c 277 s 28; 1991 c 328 s 10.]